Missouri, session 2026, SB937.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
1
Section 1. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and
2
empowered to se l l, t ransfer, grant, convey, remise, release,
3
and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of Missouri
4
in property located in the City of Harrisonville, Cass
5
County, Missouri. The property to be conveyed is more
6
particularly desc r ibed as follows:
7
A part of Lot One (1) of the Northwest Quarter
8
of Section 3, Township 44, Range 31,
9
Harrisonville, Cass County, Missouri described
10
as follows: Beginning at the Northeast corner of
11
that tract of land described in deed of record
12
in Book 558, Page 396 of the Recorder of Deeds
13
Office, Cass County, Missouri, and being on the
14
North line of said Lot 1 a distance of 268.55
15
feet from the Northwest Corner of said Lot 1;
16
run thence North 89 degrees 36 minutes 50
17
seconds West along the North line of said Lot 1
18
a distance of 200 feet; run thence South 0
19
degrees 12 minutes 00 seconds West a distance of

HCS SS SB 937 2
20
435 feet to a point; thence South 89 degrees 30
21
minutes 10 seconds East 200 feet; run thence
22
North 0 degrees 12 minutes East to the place or
23
point of beginning, a distance of 435 feet,
24
together with a pertinent easement for roadway
25
purposes over the following described tract: A
26
part of Lot One (1) of the Northeast Quarter of
27
Section 4, and A part of Lot One (1) of the
28
Northwest Quarter of Section 3, all in Township
29
44, Range 31, Harrisonville, Cass County,
30
Missouri, described as follows: Beginning at the
31
Northeast corner of Lot 1 of the Northeast
32
Quarter of Section 4, Township 44, Range 31;
33
running thence North 89 degrees 30 minutes 10
34
seconds West along the North line of said Lot 1
35
a distance of 226.51 feet to the West line of
36
James Street; run thence South 50 feet; run
37
thence East a distance of 295.06 feet; run
38
thence North 50 feet to the North line of Lot 1
39
of the Northwest Quarter of Section 3, Township
40
44, Range 31; run thence North 89 degrees 30
41
minutes 10 seconds West along the North line of
42
said Lot 1 to the place of beginning.
43
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the
44
terms a n d conditions for the conveyance as the commissioner
45
deems reasonable. Such terms and conditions may include,
46
but not be limited to, the number of appraisals required and
47
the time, place, and terms of the conveyance.
48
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the
49
instrum e nt of conveyance.
1
Section 2. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and
2
empowered to se l l, t ransfer, grant, convey, remise, release,

HCS SS SB 937 3
3
and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of Missouri
4
in property located in the City of Kirksville, Adair County,
5
Missouri. The property to be conveyed is more particularly
6
described as follows:
7
A TRACT OF LAND SITUATED IN THE NORTHWEST
8
QUARTER OF SECTION 15, TOWNSHIP 62 NORTH, RANGE
9
15 WEST, CITY OF KIRKSVILLE, ADAIR COUNTY,
10
MISSOURI AND BEING MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED
11
AS FOLLOWS:
12
BEGINNING AT A PK NAIL FOUND IN CONCRETE BEING
13
THE NORTHWEST CORNER OF LOT 1 OF CHARITON
14
SUBDIVISION AND THE SOUTH RIGHT OF WAY LINE OF
15
LAHARPE STREET;
16
THENCE ALONG SAID LOT AS FOLLOWS S00°06'25"W A
17
DISTANCE OF 179.65' TO AN IRON ROD FOUND;
18
THENCE N89°42'12"E A DISTANCE OF 210.17' TO AN
19
IRON ROD FOUND AT THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF SAID
20
LOT;
21
THENCE S00°06'47"W A DISTANCE OF 317.96' TO AN
22
IRON ROD FOUND ON THE NORTH LINE OF A SURVEY
23
RECORDED IN PLAT BOOK 1000, PAGE 1;
24
THENCE ALONG SAID SURVEY AS FOLLOWS: S89°37'55"W
25
A DISTANCE OF 824.78' TO AN IRON ROD FOUND;
26
THENCE N00°03'54"E A DISTANCE OF 498.89' TO AN
27
IRON ROD FOUND ON THE SOUTH RIGHT OF WAY LINE OF
28
LAHARPE STREET;
29
THENCE ALONG SAID RIGHT OF WAY LINE, N89°43'39"E
30
A DISTANCE OF 615.00' TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING.
31
THE ABOVE TRACT OF LAND CONTAINS 8.57 ACRES MORE
32
OR LESS, SUBJECT TO EASEMENTS AND RESTRICTIONS
33
OF RECORD, OR NOT OF RECORD, IF ANY.

HCS SS SB 937 4
34
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the
35
terms a n d conditions for the conveyance as the commissioner
36
deems reasonable. Such terms and conditions may include,
37
but not be limited to, the number of appraisals required and
38
the time, place, and terms of the conveyance.
39
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the
40
instrum e nt of conveyance.
1
Section 3. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and
2
empowered to se l l, t ransfer, grant, convey, remise, release,
3
and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of Missouri
4
in property located in the City of Springfield, Greene
5
County, Missouri. The property to be conveyed is more
6
particularly desc r ibed as follows:
7
Tract 1:
8
Beginning at the Southwest Corner of a ten (10)
9
story building, as the same existed on August
10
24, 1963, said building known as the Landers
11
Building in the City of Springfield, Greene
12
County, Missouri, which beginning point is 1.63
13
feet South of the South line of Lot Seventeen
14
(17) in Block Five (5) of the first tier of
15
lots, according to the original plat of the City
16
of Springfield, in Greene County, Missouri, and
17
is 11.07 feet East of the West line of said Lot
18
Seventeen (17); thence Northerly along the West
19
Wall of said Landers Building to the Northwest
20
Corner thereof, which latter point is 10.69 feet
21
East of the West line of said Lot Seventeen (17)
22
and 68.07 feet North of the South line of said
23
Lot Seventeen (17); thence East along the North
24
line of said Landers Building to a point on the

HCS SS SB 937 5
25
West line of Boonville Avenue in the City of
26
Springfield, Missouri, which latter point is 67
27
feet North of the Southeast Corner of said Lot
28
Seventeen (17); thence South along the East line
29
of said Landers Building to the Southeast Corner
30
thereof which latter point is 0.22 feet East and
31
2.10 Feet South of the Southeast Corner of said
32
Lot Seventeen (17); thence Westerly along the
33
South line of said Landers Building to the point
34
of beginning, all in the City of Springfield,
35
Greene County, Missouri.
36
Tract 2:
37
Beginning 69 feet North of the Southeast corner
38
of Lot 17, Block 5 in the Original Plat of the
39
Town of Springfield, Missouri, running thence
40
North 43.8 feet to Olive Street, thence West
41
103.2 feet to Baker Arcade, thence South 43.3
42
feet, thence East 103.2 feet to point of
43
beginning, all in the City of Springfield,
44
Greene County, Missouri.
45
Tract 3:
46
All space occupied by grantor hereunder and
47
extending under the sidewalks on the East and
48
South sides of the exterior of "The Landers
49
Building", and the exterior stairway on the West
50
side of "The Landers Building", all of which are
51
outside of the perimeters of the property
52
described in the Warranty Deed by Corporation
53
dated the 8th day of September, 1978 by and
54
between the grantor and grantee named herein.
55
Tract 4:

HCS SS SB 937 6
56
The South 69 feet of Lot Seventeen (17), Block
57
Five (5), first tier of lots, according to the
58
original plat of the City of Springfield, the
59
said lot or tract of land more particularly
60
described as follows:
61
Beginning on the West side of Boonville Street,
62
in the City of Springfield, on the North side of
63
the public square at the point of intersection
64
of said Boonville Street and the public square,
65
thence West 107.32 feet, thence North 69 feet,
66
thence East 107.32 feet, thence South 69 feet to
67
the place of beginning.
68
Tract 5:
69
A part of Lot Seventeen (17), Block Five (5),
70
first tier of lots, according to the original
71
plat of the City of Springfield, Greene County,
72
Missouri, described as follows:
73
Beginning at a point 112.82 feet, more or less,
74
North of the Southeast corner of aforesaid Lot
75
Seventeen (17), said point being the point of
76
intersection of the West line of Boonville
77
Avenue and the South line of Olive Street, as
78
the same are located and established on December
79
20, 1978, thence West along said South line of
80
Olive Street 103.2 feet, more or less, to the
81
East line of Baker Arcade, thence South along
82
said East line of Baker Arcade 45.33 feet, more
83
or less to the point of intersection of said
84
East line of Baker Arcade with the Northerly
85
line of a tract conveyed to the State of
86
Missouri by warranty deed recorded in Book 1695,
87
page 12, thence Easterly along the Northerly

HCS SS SB 937 7
88
line of said last-mentioned tract, and the
89
Easterly extension of the Northerly line
90
thereof, a distance of 103.2 feet, more or less,
91
to the West line of Boonville Avenue, thence
92
North 45.82 feet, more or less, to the point of
93
beginning.
94
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the
95
terms a n d conditions for the conveyance as the commissioner
96
deems reasonable. Such terms and conditions may include,
97
but not be limited to, the number of appraisals required and
98
the time, place, and terms of the conveyance.
99
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the
100
instrum e nt of conveyance.
1
Section 4. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and
2
empowered to se l l, t ransfer, grant, convey, remise, release,
3
and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of Missouri
4
in property located in the City of Springfield, Greene
5
County, Missouri. The property to be conveyed is more
6
particularly desc r ibed as follows:
7
Beginning at a point on the North side of East
8
Walnut Street 431 5/6 feet East of the Southwest
9
corner of Lot 84, Block 23, of the Original Plat
10
of Springfield, Missouri, which point is the
11
Southeast corner of James E. Keet's Lot, thence
12
East along the North side of East Walnut Street
13
to fence of J. L. Carson's Lot, thence North
14
along said fence and on line with same 240 feet,
15
thence West to the East line of Keet's Lot,
16
thence South with Keet's East Line to beginning,
17
being 86 feet front on East Walnut Street, more
18
or less, all in the City of Springfield, Greene
19
County, Missouri,

HCS SS SB 937 8
20
"Beginning on the North line of East Walnut
21
Street at the Southwest corner of Bray lot,
22
thence West 82-1/2 feet to the East line of a
23
lot formerly owned by Charles T. Keet, thence
24
North 240 feet thence West 82-1/2 feet, thence
25
North 27-1/2 feet, thence East 165 feet, thence
26
South 267 feet to the beginning, all in the
27
Southeast quarter of the Northwest quarter of
28
Section 24, Township 29, Range 22, except that
29
part deeded in Book 1555, page 1689, described
30
as beginning on the North line of East Walnut
31
Street in Springfield, Missouri, at the
32
Southwest corner of the Bray Lot, said beginning
33
point being 165.31 feet Southeast of the
34
Northeast corner of Benton Alley, and Walnut;
35
thence West 82.5 feet to the East line of lot
36
formerly owned by Charles T. Keet; thence North
37
240 feet to point of new beginning; thence West
38
82.5 feet at an exterior angle of 89 degrees 50
39
min., thence North 24.7 feet at an interior
40
angel of 89 degrees 43 min., thence East 82.4
41
feet more or less thence South 23.1 feet to
42
point of beginning all in the Southeast Quarter
43
of the Northwest quarter, Section 24, Township
44
29, Range 22."
45
Beginning on the South side of St. Louis Street
46
at a point fifty (50) feet west of the Northwest
47
corner of a lot known at one time as the W. J.
48
McDaniel Lot, which point is now the Northwest
49
corner of the Simmons Lot (formerly the A. J.
50
Clements lot), thence West along the South side
51
of St. Louis Street fifty (50) feet to Bryan's

HCS SS SB 937 9
52
Northeast corner, thence South to South Alley
53
now McDaniel Street, thence East fifty (50) feet
54
to the Southwest corner of the lot formerly
55
belonging to said Clements, thence North to the
56
beginning, all in the City of Springfield,
57
Missouri. Also described as Beginning 50 feet
58
West of the Northwest corner of Lot 1,
59
Kimbroughs Addition, West 50 feet, thence South
60
222 feet to McDaniel Street, East 50 feet, North
61
to the beginning.
62
Commencing at the northeast corner of Walnut and
63
Jefferson Streets; thence South 87°53'42" East
64
310.5 feet along the north right-of-way line of
65
Walnut Street to an iron pin; thence North
66
0°45'23" West 206.81 feet to an iron pin for a
67
point of beginning; thence continuing North
68
0°45'23" West 181.83 feet to a chiseled "X" in
69
concrete on the South right-of-way line of
70
McDaniel Street; thence North 89°06' East 107.19
71
feet along the South right-of-way line of
72
McDaniel Street to an iron pin; thence South
73
1°24'33" East 184.71 feet to an iron pin; thence
74
North 89°23'31" West 109.33 feet to the point of
75
beginning. Containing 0.45 acres in the City of
76
Springfield, Greene County, Missouri.
77
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the
78
terms a n d conditions for the conveyance as the commissioner
79
deems reasonable. Such terms and conditions may include,
80
but not be limited to, the number of appraisals required and
81
the time, place, and terms of the conveyance.
82
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the
83
instrum e nt of conveyance.

HCS SS SB 937 10
1
Section 5. 1. The governor is hereby granted and
2
empowered to se l l, t ransfer, grant, or convey an easement
3
over, on, or under property located in the City of Festus,
4
Jefferson County, Missouri. The easement is more
5
particularly described as f o llows:
6
Part of a larger tract of land described in Deed
7
Book 70 at Page 115, lying in United States
8
Survey Number 910, Township 40 North, Range 5
9
East of the Fifth Principal Meridian, Jefferson
10
County, Missouri. Being further described as
11
follows:
12
Beginning at a point lying South 70°37'31" West,
13
a distance of 69.85 feet from the Northeast
14
Corner of said larger tract; thence South
15
25°30'00" East, a distance o f 58.27 feet; thence
16
South 82°46'45" East, a distance of 17.98 feet
17
to the beginning of a curve tangent to said
18
line; thence easterly and southeasterly a
19
dista n ce of 94.85 feet along the curve concave
20
to the southwest, having a radius of 154.00 feet
21
and a central angle of 35°17'23"; thence South
22
47°29'22" East tangent to said curve, a distance
23
of 37.74 feet to the beginning of a curve
24
tangent to said line; thence southeasterly a
25
distance of 28.64 feet along the curve concave
26
to the southwest, having a radius of 214.00 feet
27
and a central angle of 7°40'02"; thence South
28
39°49'21" East tangent to said c u rve, a distance
29
of 159.54 feet to the beginning of a curve
30
tangent to said line; thence southeasterly and
31
southerly a distance of 100.05 feet along the
32
curve concave to the southwest, having a radius

HCS SS SB 937 11
33
of 314.00 feet and a central angle of 18°15'22";
34
thence South 21°33'59" East tangent to said
35
curve, a distance of 126.81 feet to the
36
beginning of a curve tangent to said line;
37
thence southerly and southeasterly a distance of
38
85.41 feet along the curve concave to the
39
northeast, having a radius of 386.00 feet and a
40
central angle of 12°40'38"; thence South
41
34°14'37" East tangent to sa id curve, a distance
42
of 177.22 feet; thence North 55°45'23" East, a
43
distance of 94.6 7 feet; thence South 38°40'29"
44
East, a distance of 50.00 feet; thence South
45
28°31'17" West, a distance of 1 6 8.37 feet;
46
thence North 61°20'49" West, a distance of 50.00
47
feet to the beginning of a curve radial to said
48
line; thence northeasterly, northerly and
49
northwesterly a distance of 48.30 feet along the
50
curve concave to the west, having a radius of
51
44.00 feet and a central angle of 62°53'48";
52
thence North 34°14'37" West tangent to said
53
curve, a distance of 220.45 feet to the
54
beginning of a curve tangent to said line;
55
thence northwesterly and northerly a distance of
56
96.47 feet along the curve concave to the
57
northeast, having a radius of 436.00 feet and a
58
central angle of 12°40'38"; thence North
59
21°33'59" West tangent to said curve, a distance
60
of 126.81 feet to the beginning of a curve
61
tangent to said line; thence northerly and
62
northwesterly a distance of 84.12 feet along the
63
curve concave to the southwest, having a radius
64
of 264.00 feet and a central angle of 18°15'22";

HCS SS SB 937 12
65
thence North 39°49'21" West tangent to said
66
curve, a distance of 159.54 feet to the
67
beginning of a curve tangent to said line;
68
thence northwesterly a distance of 21.95 feet
69
along the curve concave to the southwest, having
70
a radius of 164.00 feet and a central angle of
71
7°40'02"; thence North 47°29'22" West tangent to
72
said curve, a distance of 37.74 feet to the
73
beginning of a curve tangent to said line;
74
thence northwesterly and westerly a distance of
75
64.06 feet along the curve concave to the
76
southwest, having a radius of 104.00 feet and a
77
central angle of 35°17'23"; thence North
78
82°46'45" West tangent to said curve, a distance
79
of 56.40 feet; thence North 53°01'15" West, a
80
distance of 36.34 feet; thence North 16°26'26"
81
East, a distance of 68.0 6 feet; thence North
82
70°37'31" East, a distance of 30.83 feet to the
83
end of easement.
84
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the
85
terms a n d conditions for the conveyance as the commissioner
86
deems reasonable. Such terms and conditions may include,
87
but not be limited to, the number of appraisals required and
88
the time, place, and terms of the conveyance.
89
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the
90
instrum e nt of conveyance.
1
Section 6. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and
2
empowered to se l l, t ransfer, grant, convey, remise, release,
3
and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of Missouri
4
in property located in the City of Doniphan, Ripley County,
5
Missouri, to the Doniphan school district. The property to
6
be conveyed is more particularly described as follows:

HCS SS SB 937 13
7
All of Lot Number Nine, in Block Number Three,
8
in Cox's Addition to the City of Doniphan,
9
Missouri.
10
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the
11
terms a n d conditions for the sale, transfer, grant,
12
conveyance, or release as the commissioner deems
13
reasonable. Such terms and conditions may include, but not
14
be limited t o, the number of appraisals required and the
15
time, place, and terms of the sale, transfer, grant,
16
conveyance, or release.
17
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the
18
instrum e nt of conveyance.
1
Section 7. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and
2
empowered to se l l, t ransfer, grant, convey, remise, release,
3
and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of Missouri
4
in property located in the City of Higginsville, Lafayette
5
County, Missouri. The property to be conveyed is more
6
particularly desc r ibed as follows:
7
Tract 1:
8
A tract of land in the Northwest ¼ of the
9
Northwest ¼ of Section 12, Township 49 North of
10
the Base line, Range 26, West of the Fifth
11
Principal Meridian, in Higginsville, Lafayette
12
County, Missouri, described as follows:
13
Beginning at a point 529.00 feet West a n d 30.0
14
feet South of the Northeast corner of said
15
Northwest ¼ of Northwest ¼ of Section 12,
16
Township 49 North, Range 26 West; thence from
17
the point of beginning West parallel to and 30.0
18
feet South of the North line of said ¼ ¼ section
19
444.42 feet to a point; thence South 490.08 feet
20
to a point, thence East 444.42 feet to a point

HCS SS SB 937 14
21
400.00 feet West of the Westerly right of way
22
line of Missouri State Highway No. 13; thence
23
North parallel with said 13 Highway right of way
24
490.08 feet to the point of beginning,
25
containing 5 acres, more or less, EXCEPT that
26
part, if any, in roads, public or private.
27
Tract 2:
28
A tract of land located in the Northwest ¼ of
29
the Northwest ¼ of Section 12, Township 49 North
30
of the Base line, Range 26 West of the Fifth
31
Principal Meridian, in Higginsville, Lafayette
32
County, Missouri, described as follows:
33
Beginning at a point 529.00 feet West and 520.08
34
feet South from the Northeast corner of said
35
Northwest ¼ of Northwest ¼ of Section 12,
36
Township 49 North, Range 26, West; thence from
37
the point of beginning 444.42 feet West to a
38
point; thence South 197 feet to a point; thence
39
East 444.42 feet to a point; thence North 197
40
feet to the point of beginning.
41
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the
42
terms a n d conditions for the sale, transfer, grant,
43
conveyance, or release as the commissioner deems
44
reasonable. Such terms and conditions may include, but not
45
be limited t o, the number of appraisals required and the
46
time, place, and terms of the sale, transfer, grant,
47
conveyance, or release.
48
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the
49
instrum e nt of conveyance.
1
Section 8. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and
2
empowered to se l l, t ransfer, grant, convey, remise, release,
3
and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of Missouri

HCS SS SB 937 15
4
in property located in the City of Jefferson, Cole County,
5
Missouri. The property to be conveyed is more particularly
6
described as follows:
7
PART OF THE WEST HALF OF THE SOUTHEAST QUARTER
8
OF SECTION 34, TOWNSHIP 45 NORTH, RANGE 12 WEST,
9
IN THE CITY OF JEFFERSON, COLE COUNTY, MISSOURI,
10
MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:
11
FROM THE NORTHEAST CORNER OF THE WEST HALF OF
12
THE SOUTHEAST QUARTER OF SAID SECTION 34; THENCE
13
SOUTH 05 DEGREES 46 MINUTES 13 SECONDS EAST
14
ALONG THE EAST LINE OF THE WEST HALF OF THE
15
SOUTHEAST QUARTER OF SAID SECTION 34 AND THE
16
WEST LINE OF RIVERVIEW CEMETERY, 2222.85 FEET TO
17
THE POINT OF BEGINNING FOR THIS DESCRIPTION;
18
THENCE CONTINUING SOUTH 05 DEGREES 46 MINUTES 13
19
SECONDS EAST ALONG SAID WEST LINE OF RIVERVIEW
20
CEMETERY AND THE EAST LINE OF THE WEST HALF OF
21
THE SOUTHEAST QUARTER OF SECTION 34, 400.12 FEET
22
TO THE NORTHERLY LINE OF WEST MAIN STREET;
23
THENCE WESTERLY ALONG THE NORTHERLY LINE OF SAID
24
WEST MAIN STREET, ON A CURVE TO THE LEFT, HAVING
25
A RADIUS OF 1940.08 FEET, A DISTANCE OF 226.85
26
FEET; THENCE SOUTH 82 DEGREES 25 MINUTES 40
27
SECONDS WEST ALONG THE NORTH LINE OF SAID WEST
28
MAIN STREET, 73.40 FEET TO THE EAST LINE OF
29
HOOVER ROAD; THENCE NORTH 05 DEGREES 46 MINUTES
30
13 SECONDS WEST ALONG THE EAST LINE OF HOOVER
31
ROAD, 396.31 FEET; THENCE LEAVING THE EAST LINE
32
OF HOOVER ROAD, NORTH 84 DEGREES 13 MINUTES 47
33
SECONDS EAST, 300.00 FEET TO THE POINT OF
34
BEGINNING.

HCS SS SB 937 16
35
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the
36
terms a n d conditions for the sale, transfer, grant,
37
conveyance, or release as the commissioner deems
38
reasonable. Such terms and conditions may include, but not
39
be limited t o, the number of appraisals required and the
40
time, place, and terms of the sale, transfer, grant,
41
conveyance, or release.
42
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the
43
instrum e nt of conveyance.
1
Section 9. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and
2
empowered to se l l, t ransfer, grant, convey, remise, release,
3
and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of Missouri
4
in property located in the City of Richwoods, Washington
5
County, Missouri. The property to be conveyed is more
6
particularly desc r ibed as follows:
7
Tract #1: Part of the Northeast Quarter (NE1/4)
8
of the Nor thwest Quarter (NW1/4) of Section
9
Fourteen (14), Township Thirty-nine (39) North,
10
Range One (1) East particularly described as
11
follows:
12
Commencing at a pile of stones marking the
13
Northwest corner of Section Fourteen (14)
14
Township Thirty-nine (39) North, Range One (1)
15
East, thence South 63 degrees 38 minutes East
16
1533.24 feet to an iron pin set in concrete for
17
the Northwest corner of the herein conveyed
18
tract or parcel and the true point of beginning;
19
thence from said true point of beginning North
20
70 degrees East, at 125.00 feet pass an iron pin
21
set in concrete a total distance of 250.00 feet
22
to an iron pin set in concrete for the Northeast
23
corner; thence South 20 degrees East, at 328.9

HCS SS SB 937 17
24
feet pass an iron pin set in concrete on the
25
North boundary of Missouri State Farm to Market
26
Road "T" a total distance of 359.7 feet to a
27
point on the centerline of said road for the
28
Southeast corner; thence South 64 degrees 40
29
minutes West 0.75 feet along the centerline of
30
said road to a point marking the P.C. of a
31
curve; thence on a curve to the left along said
32
centerline whose interior angle is 39 degrees 03
33
minutes and whose radius is 410.28 feet and
34
whose tangent bearing is South 64 degrees 40
35
minutes West for a distance of 279.62 feet to a
36
point for the Southwest corner; thence North 20
37
degrees West, at 53.81 feet pass an iron pin set
38
in concrete, a total distance of 474.41 feet to
39
the point of beginning, containing 2.07 acres,
40
more or less, exclusive of that portion lying
41
within the public road. All bearings recited
42
herein are based on True North as determined by
43
Solar Observation.
44
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the
45
terms a n d conditions for the sale, transfer, grant,
46
conveyance, or release as the commissioner deems
47
reasonable. Such terms and conditions may include, but not
48
be limited t o, the number of appraisals required and the
49
time, place, and terms of the sale, transfer, grant,
50
conveyance, or release.
51
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the
52
instrum e nt of conveyance.
1
Section 10. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and
2
empowered to sell , t r ansfer, grant, convey, remise, release,
3
and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of Missouri

HCS SS SB 937 18
4
in property located in Jackson County, Missouri. The
5
property to be conveyed is more particularly des c ribed as
6
follows:
7
All that part of the Southwest Quarter (SW ¼) of
8
Section 18, Township 48, Range 31, in Lee's
9
Summit, Jackson County, Missouri, described as
10
follows: Beginning at a point on the North line
11
of said q uarter-section 434.94 feet East of the
12
Northwest corner thereof; thence East along said
13
North line 601.83 feet; then South, at right
14
angles from the last described course 601.83
15
feet, thence West, at right angles from the last
16
described course 601.83 feet; thence North, at
17
right angles from the last described course
18
601.83 feet to the point of beginning;
19
containing 362,199 square feet, or approximately
20
8.315 acres.
21
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the
22
terms a n d conditions for the sale, transfer, grant,
23
conveyance, or release as the commissioner deems
24
reasonable. Such terms and conditions may include, but not
25
be limited t o, the number of appraisals required and the
26
time, place, and terms of the sale, transfer, grant,
27
conveyance, or release.
28
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the
29
instrum e nt of conveyance.
1
Section 11. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and
2
empowered to sell , t r ansfer, grant, convey, remise, release,
3
and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of Missouri
4
in property located in Cole County, Missouri, to the City of
5
Jefferson. The property to be conveyed is more particularly
6
described a s follows:

HCS SS SB 937 19
7
TRACT DESCRIPTION:
8
A TRACT OF LAND BEING PART OF INLOT 297, AND
9
INLOT 301, CITY OF JEFFERSON, COLE COUNTY,
10
MISSOURI, BEING PART OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY
11
THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 341 OF THE COLE COUNTY
12
RECORDS, BEING MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED AS
13
FOLLOWS:
14
COMMENCING AT THE NORTHWEST CORNER OF INLOT 297
15
OF THE CITY OF JEFFERSON, ALSO BEING THE
16
NORTHWEST CORNER OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE
17
DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 341 OF THE COLE COUNTY
18
RECORDS, THENCE WITH THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID
19
INLOT 297 AND THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT,
20
N 42°14'53" E, 154.53 FEET, TO THE POINT OF
21
BEGINNING
22
THENCE FROM THE POINT OF BEGINNING, LEAVING THE
23
NORTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 297, AND THE NORTHWEST
24
LINE OF SAID TRACT, S 47°50'05" E, 19.74 FEET;
25
THENCE S 42°09'56" W, 158.35 FEET; THENCE S
26
48°23'10" E, 72.95 FEET; THENCE S 41°36'50" W,
27
98.71 FEET, TO A POINT ON THE SOUTHWEST LINE OF
28
THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE
29
341 OF THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS; THENCE WITH THE
30
SOUTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT THE FOLLOWING
31
COURSES: N 48°09'32" W, 78.99 FEET; THENCE N
32
42°24'31" E, 32.97 FEET; THENCE N 64°34'23" W,
33
15.78 FEET, TO A POINT ON THE NORTHWEST LINE OF
34
INLOT 301, ALSO BEING A POINT ON THE NORTHWEST
35
LINE OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK
36
277 PAGE 341 OF THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS; THENCE
37
WITH THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID INLOT 301 AND
38
INLOT 297, ALSO BEING THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID

HCS SS SB 937 20
39
TRACT, S 42°14'53" E, 228.38 FEET TO THE POINT
40
OF BEGINNING AND CONTAINS 0.27 ACRES MORE OR
41
LESS.
42
TEMPORARY CONSTRUCTION EASEMENT:
43
A TRACT BEING PART OF INLOT 297, INLOT 301,
44
INLOT 302, AND INLOT 303 CITY OF JEFFERSON, COLE
45
COUNTY, MISSOURI, BEING PART OF THE TRACT
46
DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 341 OF
47
THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS, BEING MORE PARTICULARLY
48
DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:
49
BEGINNING AT THE NORTHWEST CORNER OF INLOT 297
50
OF THE CITY OF JEFFERSON, ALSO BEING THE
51
NORTHWEST CORNER OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE
52
DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 341 OF THE COLE COUNTY
53
RECORDS, THENCE WITH THE NORTHEAST LINE OF SAID
54
INLOT 297 AND THE NORTHEAST LINE OF SAID TRACT,
55
S 48°09'25" E, 79.52 FEET; THENCE LEAVING THE
56
NORTHEAST LINE OF INLOT 297, AND THE NORTHEAST
57
LINE OF SAID TRACT, S 42°09'56" W, 275.23 FEET;
58
THENCE S 48°23'09" E, 49.69 FEET; THENCE S
59
09°39'05" W, 150.87 FEET; THENCE S 41°36'50" W,
60
8.27 FEET, TO A POINT ON THE SOUTH LINE OF THE
61
TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 341
62
OF THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS; THENCE WITH THE
63
SOUTH LINE OF SAID TRACT, N 48°38'41" W, 32.24
64
FEET; THENCE N 48°09'32" W, 84.73 FEET; THENCE
65
LEAVING THE SOUTH LINE OF SAID TRACT, N
66
41°36'50" E, 98.71 FEET; THENCE N 48°23'10" W,
67
72.95 FEET; THENCE N 42°09'56" E, 158.35 FEET;
68
THENCE N 47°50'05" W, 19.74 FEET, TO A POINT ON
69
THE NORTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 297, A LSO BEING A
70
POINT ON THE NORTHWEST LINE OF THE TRACT

HCS SS SB 937 21
71
DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 341 OF
72
THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS; THENCE WITH THE
73
NORTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 297, AND THE NORTHWEST
74
LINE OF SAID TRACT, N 42°14'53" E, 154.38 FEET
75
TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING AND CONTAINS 0.76 ACRE
76
MORE OR LESS.
77
TRACT DESCRIPTION:
78
A TRACT OF LAND BEING PART OF INLOTS 431 AND
79
435, CITY OF JEFFERSON, COLE COUNTY, MISSOURI,
80
BEING PART OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN
81
BOOK 277 PAGE 342 OF THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS,
82
BEING MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:
83
BEGINNING AT THE NORTHEAST CORNER OF INLOT 431
84
OF THE CITY OF JEFFERSON, ALSO BEING THE
85
NORTHEAST CORNER OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE
86
DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 342 OF THE COLE COUNTY
87
RECORDS, THENCE WITH THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF SAID
88
INLOT 431 AND INLOT 435, ALSO BEING THE
89
SOUTHEAST LINE OF SAID TRACT, S 42°08'00" W,
90
417.44 FEET TO THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF INLOT
91
435, ALSO BEING THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF SAID
92
TRACT; THENCE WITH THE SOUTHWEST LINE OF INLOT
93
435, AND WITH THE SOUTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT,
94
N 47°42'52" W, 28.00 FEET; THENCE LEAVING THE
95
SOUTHWEST LINE OF SAID INLOT 435 AND SAID TRACT,
96
N 41°53'46" E, 356.78 FEET; THENCE N 21°00'20"
97
E, 44.38 FEET; THENCE N 18°15'25" W, 39.27 FEET
98
TO A POINT ON THE NORTHEAST LINE OF INLOT 431,
99
ALSO BEING A POINT ON THE NORTHEAST LINE OF THE
100
TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 342
101
OF THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS; THENCE WITH THE
102
NORTHEAST LINE OF SAID INLOT 431 AND THE

HCS SS SB 937 22
103
NORTHEAST LINE OF SAID TRACT, S 47°42'52" E,
104
79.61 FEET TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING AND
105
CONTAINS 0.30 ACRES MORE OR LESS.
106
TEMPORARY CONSTRUCTION EASEMENT:
107
A TRACT BEING PART OF INLOTS 428 THRU 431 AND
108
INLOT 435, CITY OF JEFFERSON, COLE COUNTY,
109
MISSOURI, BEING PART OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY
110
THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 342 OF THE COLE COUNTY
111
RECORDS, BEING MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED AS
112
FOLLOWS:
113
COMMENCING AT THE NORTHEAST CORNER OF INLOT 431
114
OF THE CITY OF JEFFERSON, ALSO BEING THE
115
NORTHEAST CORNER OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE
116
DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 342 OF THE COLE COUNTY
117
RECORDS, THENCE WITH THE NORTHEAST LINE OF SAID
118
INLOT 431 AND THE NORTHEAST LINE OF SAID TRACT,
119
N 47°42'52" W, 79.61 FEET, TO THE POINT OF
120
BEGINNING:
121
THENCE FROM THE POINT OF BEGINNING, LEAVING THE
122
NORTHEAST LINE OF INLOT 431, AND THE NORTHEAST
123
LINE OF SAID TRACT, S 18°15'25" E, 39.27 FEET;
124
THENCE S 21°00'20" W, 44.38 FEET; THENCE S
125
41°53'46" W, 356.78 FEET, TO A POINT ON THE
126
SOUTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 435, ALSO BEING A POINT
127
ON THE SOUTHWEST LINE OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY
128
THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 342 OF THE COLE COUNTY
129
RECORDS; THENCE N 47°42'52" E, 38.00 FEET, WITH
130
THE SOUTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 435, ALSO BEING THE
131
SOUTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT; THENCE LEAVING THE
132
SOUTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 435, ALSO BEING THE
133
SOUTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE
134
DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 342 OF THE COLE COUNTY

HCS SS SB 937 23
135
RECORDS, N 42°09'55" E, 320.16 FEET; THENCE N
136
03°49'48" W, 97.35 FEET; THENCE N 48°11'21" W,
137
120.57 FEET; THENCE N 88°09'33" W, 223.89 TO A
138
POINT ON THE NORTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 428, ALSO
139
BEING A POINT ON THE NORTHWEST LINE OF THE TRACT
140
DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 342 OF
141
THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS; THENCE WITH THE
142
NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID INLOT 428, ALSO BEING THE
143
NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT, N 42°05'08" E,
144
167.29 FEET TO THE NORTHWEST CORNER OF SAID
145
INLOT 428 AND THE NORTHWEST CORNER OF SAID
146
TRACT; THENCE WITH THE NORTHEAST LINE OF SAID
147
INLOT 428, 429, 430 AND 431, ALSO BEING THE
148
NORTHEAST LINE OF SAID TRACT, S 47°42'52" E,
149
338.04 FEET, TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING AND
150
CONTAINS 0.86 ACRE MORE OR LESS.
151
TRACT DESCRIPTION:
152
A TRACT OF LAND BEING PART OF INLOTS 436 AND
153
437, CITY OF JEFFERSON, COLE COUNTY, MISSOURI,
154
BEING PART OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN
155
BOOK 277 PAGE 339 OF THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS,
156
BEING MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:
157
COMMENCING AT THE NORTHWEST CORNER OF INLOT 436
158
OF THE CITY OF JEFFERSON, ALSO BEING THE
159
NORTHWEST CORNER OF TRACT 2.70 AS DESCRIBED BY
160
THE DEED IN BOOK 121 PAGE 353 OF THE COLE COUNTY
161
RECORDS, THENCE WITH THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID
162
INLOT 436 AND THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT
163
2.70, S 42°08'00" W, 12.68 FEET TO THE SOUTHWEST
164
CORNER OF SAID TRACT 2.70, THE POINT OF
165
BEGINNING:

HCS SS SB 937 24
166
THENCE FROM THE POINT OF BEGINNING, LEAVING THE
167
NORTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 436, AND WITH THE
168
SOUTHWEST LINE OF TRACT 2.70 AS DESCRIBED BY THE
169
DEED IN BOOK 121 PAGE 353 OF THE COLE COUNTY
170
RECORDS, WITH A CURVE TO THE RIGHT 2.31 FEET,
171
CURVE RADIUS 13.83 FEET, CHORD S 53°30'25" E,
172
2.31 FEET; THENCE S 48°42'49" E, 103.75 FEET TO
173
THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF SAID TRACT 2.70, ALSO
174
BEING THE SOUTHWEST CORNER OF THE TRACT
175
DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 123 PAGE 284 OF
176
THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS; THENCE WITH THE
177
SOUTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT, S 59°09'35" E,
178
17.29 FEET; THENCE S 48°39'20" E, 33.54 FEET TO
179
THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF SAID TRACT, ALSO BEING
180
THE SOUTHWEST CORNER OF TRACT 2.60 AS DESCRIBED
181
BY THE DEED IN BOOK 121 PAGE 353; THENCE WITH
182
THE SOUTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT S 48°41'47" E,
183
41.38 FEET; THENCE LEAVING THE SOUTHWEST LINE OF
184
SAID TRACT, S 41°38'16" W, 10.46 FEET; THENCE N
185
48°04'58" W, 70.28 FEET; THENCE WITH A CURVE TO
186
THE LEFT 99.14 FEET, CURVE RADIUS 89.0 0 FEET,
187
CHORD N 79°59'40" W, 94.09 FEET; THENCE S
188
68°05'37" W, 58.04 FEET; THENCE N 21°54'23" W,
189
4.43 FEET; THENCE S 68°05'37" W, 42.59 FEET TO A
190
POINT ON THE NORTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 436, ALSO
191
BEING A POINT ON THE NORTHWEST LINE OF THE TRACT
192
DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 339 OF
193
THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS; THENCE WITH THE
194
NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID INLOT 436 AND THE
195
NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT, N 42°08'00" E,
196
143.09 FEET TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING AND
197
CONTAINS 0.16 ACRES MORE OR LESS.

HCS SS SB 937 25
198
TEMPORARY CONSTRUCTION EASEMENT:
199
A TRACT BEING PART OF INLOTS 436 THRU 440, CITY
200
OF JEFFERSON, COLE COUNTY, MISSOURI, BEING PART
201
OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN BOOK 277
202
PAGE 339 OF THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS, BEING MORE
203
PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:
204
COMMENCING AT THE NORTHWEST CORNER OF INLOT 436
205
OF THE CITY OF JEFFERSON, ALSO BEING THE
206
NORTHWEST CORNER OF TRACT 2.70 AS DESCRIBED BY
207
THE DEED IN BOOK 121 PAGE 353 OF THE COLE COUNTY
208
RECORDS, THENCE WITH THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID
209
INLOT 436 AND THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT
210
2.70, S 42°08'00" W, 12.68 FEET TO THE SOUTHWEST
211
CORNER OF SAID TRACT 2.70; THENCE CONTINUING
212
WITH THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID INLOT 436, S
213
42°08'00" W, 143.09 FEET, TO THE POINT OF
214
BEGINNING:
215
THENCE FROM THE POINT OF BEGINNING, LEAVING THE
216
NORTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 436, N 68°05'37" E,
217
42.59 FEET; THENCE S 21°54'23" W, 4.43 FEET;
218
THENCE N 68°05'37" E, 58.04 FEET; THENCE WITH A
219
CURVE TO THE RIGHT 99.14 FEET, CURVE RADIUS
220
89.00 FEET, CHORD N 79°59'40" E, 94.09 FEET;
221
THENCE S 48°04'58" E, 70.28 FEET; THENCE N
222
41°38'16" E, 10.46 FEET TO A POINT ON THE
223
SOUTHWEST LINE OF TRACT 2.60 AS DESCRIBED BY THE
224
DEED IN BOOK 121 PAGE 353 OF THE COLE COUNTY
225
RECORDS; THENCE WITH THE SOUTHWEST LINE OF
226
TRACTS 2.60, 2.50, 2.40, AND 2.30 AS DESCRIBED
227
BY THE DEED IN BOOK 121 PAGE 353 OF THE COLE
228
COUNTY RECORDS, S 48°41'51" E, 135.07 FEET;
229
THENCE S 53°55'14" E, 61.87 FEET, TO A POINT ON

HCS SS SB 937 26
230
THE NORTHEAST LINE OF INLOT OF 439, ALSO BEING
231
THE NORTHEAST CORNER OF TRACT 2.30 AS DESCRIBED
232
BY THE DEED IN BOOK 121 PAGE 353 OF THE COLE
233
COUNTY RECORDS; THENCE WITH THE NORTHEAST LINE
234
OF INLOT 439, S 48°09'18" E, 22.95 TO THE
235
NORTHEAST CORNER OF SAID INLOT 439; THENCE WITH
236
THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF SAID INLOT 439, S
237
42°08'00" W, 49.40 FEET; THENCE LEAVING THE
238
SOUTHEAST LINE OF SAID INLOT 439, N 48°21'44" W,
239
277.24 FEET; THENCE S 86°54'06" W, 142.07 FEET;
240
THENCE S 42°09'55" W, 266.70 FEET, TO A POINT ON
241
THE SOUTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 440; THENCE WITH THE
242
SOUTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 440, N 48°09'32" W,
243
40.00 TO THE SOUTHWEST CORNER OF SAID INLOT 440;
244
THENCE WITH THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID INLOT
245
440, N 42°08'00" E, 261.67 FEET TO THE POINT OF
246
BEGINNING AND CONTAINS 0.70 ACRE MORE OR LESS.
247
TRACT DESCRIPTION:
248
A TRACT OF LAND BEING PART OF INLOTS 295 AND
249
296, CITY OF JEFFERSON, COLE COUNTY, MISSOURI,
250
BEING PART OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE DEED IN
251
BOOK 277 PAGE 340 OF THE COLE COUNTY RECORDS,
252
BEING MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS:
253
BEGINNING AT THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF INLOT 296
254
OF THE CITY OF JEFFERSON, ALSO BEING THE
255
SOUTHEAST CORNER OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE
256
DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 340 OF THE COLE COUNTY
257
RECORDS, THENCE WITH THE SOUTHWEST LINE OF SAID
258
INLOT 295 AND INLOT 296, ALSO BEING THE
259
SOUTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT, N 47°42'52" W,
260
208.34 FEET TO THE SOUTHWEST CORNER OF INLOT
261
295, ALSO BEING THE SOUTHWEST CORNER OF SAID

HCS SS SB 937 27
262
TRACT; THENCE WITH THE NORTHWEST LINE OF INLOT
263
295, AND WITH THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT,
264
N 42°05'08" E, 56.27 FEET; THENCE LEAVING THE
265
NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID INLOT 295 AND SAID TRACT,
266
S 48°11'21" E, 149.10 FEET; THENCE S 57°43'36"
267
E, 60.32 FEET, TO A POINT ON THE SOUTHEAST LINE
268
OF INLOT 296, ALSO BEING A POINT ON THE
269
SOUTHEAST LINE OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE
270
DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 340 OF THE COLE COUNTY
271
RECORDS; THENCE WITH THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF SAID
272
INLOT 296 AND THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF SAID TRACT,
273
S 42°14'53" W, 68.00 FEET TO THE POINT OF
274
BEGINNING AND CONTAINS 0.28 ACRES MORE OR LESS.
275
TEMPORARY CONSTRUCTION EASEMENT:
276
A TRACT BEING PART OF INLOTS 292, INLOT 295 AND
277
INLOT 296, CITY OF JEFFERSON, COLE COUNTY,
278
MISSOURI, BEING PART OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY
279
THE DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 340 OF THE COLE COUNTY
280
RECORDS, BEING MORE PARTICULARLY DESCRIBED AS
281
FOLLOWS:
282
COMMENCING AT THE SOUTHEAST CORNER OF INLOT 296
283
OF THE CITY OF JEFFERSON, ALSO BEING THE
284
SOUTHEAST CORNER OF THE TRACT DESCRIBED BY THE
285
DEED IN BOOK 277 PAGE 340 OF THE COLE COUNTY
286
RECORDS, THENCE WITH THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF SAID
287
INLOT 296 AND THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF SAID TRACT,
288
N 42°14'53" E, 68.00 FEET, TO THE POINT OF
289
BEGINNING:
290
THENCE FROM THE POINT OF BEGINNING, LEAVING THE
291
SOUTHEAST LINE OF INLOT 296, AND THE SOUTHEAST
292
LINE OF SAID TRACT, N 57°43'36" W, 60.32 FEET;
293
THENCE N 48°11'21" W, 149.10 FEET, TO A POINT ON

HCS SS SB 937 28
294
THE NORTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 295, ALSO BEING A
295
POINT ON THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT;
296
THENCE WITH THE NORTHWEST LINE OF INLOT 295 AND
297
THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT, N 42°05'08" E,
298
70.01 FEET; THENCE LEAVING THE NORTHWEST LINE OF
299
INLOT 295 AND THE NORTHWEST LINE OF SAID TRACT,
300
S 48°11'45" E, 153.64 FEET; THENCE N 42°09'56"
301
E, 290.35 FEET, TO A POINT ON THE NORTHEAST LINE
302
OF INLOT 292, ALSO BEING A POINT ON THE
303
NORTHEAST LINE OF SAID TRACT; THENCE WITH THE
304
NORTHEAST LINE OF INLOT 292 AND THE NORTHEAST
305
LINE OF SAID TRACT, S 47°47'48" E, 55.48 FEET,
306
TO THE NORTHEAST CORNER OF INLOT 292, ALSO BEING
307
THE NORTHEAST CORNER OF SAID TRACT; THENCE WITH
308
THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF SAID INLOT 292, AND INLOT
309
296, ALSO BEING THE SOUTHEAST LINE OF SAID
310
TRACT, S 42°14'41" W, 349.75 FEET, TO THE POINT
311
OF BEGINNING AND CONTAINS 0.70 ACRE MORE OR LESS.
312
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the
313
terms a n d conditions for the conveyance as the commissioner
314
deems reasonable. Such terms and conditions may include,
315
but not be limite d to, the number of appraisals required and
316
the time, place, and terms of the conveyance.
317
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the
318
instrum e nt of conveyance.
1
Section 12. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and
2
empowered to sell , t r ansfer, grant, convey, remise, release,
3
and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of Missouri
4
in property located in Nodaway County, Missouri. The
5
property to be conveyed is more particularly des c ribed as
6
follows:

HCS SS SB 937 29
7
Tract 1
8
Beginning at the North Quarter Corner Section
9
13, Township 64 North, Range 36 West, Nodaway
10
County, Missouri; thence along Section Line,
11
South 86 degrees 48 minutes 14 seconds East
12
1557.37 feet; thence departing said line, South
13
03 degrees 05 minutes 47 seconds West 1037.56
14
feet; thence South 59 degrees 30 minutes 04
15
seconds East 503.01 feet; thence South 18
16
degrees 22 minutes 57 seconds West 282.59 feet;
17
thence along the northern right-of-way of the
18
former Norfolk & Western Railroad the following
19
courses and distances: South 89 degrees 57
20
minutes 27 seconds West 229.70 feet; thence
21
532.26 feet by arc distance along a curve to the
22
right having a radius of 3224.02 feet and a
23
chord bearing of North 85 degrees 20 minutes 37
24
seconds West 531.66 feet; thence North 80
25
degrees 35 minutes 32 seconds West 1145.21 feet;
26
thence departing said right-of-way and along
27
Quarter Section Line, North 01 degrees 52
28
minutes 08 seconds East 1416.90 feet to the
29
point beginning.
30
Tract 2
31
Commencing at the North Quarter Corner Section
32
13, Township 64 North, Range 36 West, Nodaway
33
County, Missouri; thence along Quarter Section
34
Line, South 01 degrees 52 minutes 08 seconds
35
West 1416.90 feet to the Point of Beginning;
36
thence continuing along Quarter Section Line,
37
South 01 degrees 52 minutes 08 seconds West
38
50.44 feet; thence along the centerline of the

HCS SS SB 937 30
39
former Norfolk & Western Railroad the following
40
courses and distances: South 80 degrees 35
41
minutes 32 seconds East 1138.61 feet; thence
42
540.49 feet by arc distance along a curve to the
43
left having a radius of 3274.02 feet and a chord
44
bearing of South 85 degrees 20 minutes 36
45
seconds East 539.87 feet; thence North 89
46
degrees 57 minutes 27 seconds East 213.04 feet;
47
thence departing said centerline, North 18
48
degrees 22 minutes 57 seconds East 52.70 feet;
49
thence along the northern right-of-way of the
50
former Norfolk & Western Railroad the following
51
courses and distances: South 89 degrees 57
52
minutes 27 seconds West 229.70 feet; thence
53
532.26 feet by arc distance along a curve to the
54
right having a radius of 3224.02 feet and a
55
chord bearing of North 85 degrees 20 minutes 37
56
seconds West 531.66 feet; thence North 80
57
degrees 35 minutes 32 seconds West 1145.21 feet;
58
to the point of beginning.
59
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the
60
terms a n d conditions for the conveyance as the commissioner
61
deems reasonable. Such terms and conditions may include,
62
but not be limited to, the number of appraisals required and
63
the time, place, and terms of the conveyance.
64
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the
65
instrum e nt of conveyance.
1
Section 13. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and
2
empowered to sell , t r ansfer, grant, convey, remise, release,
3
and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of Missouri
4
in property located in the city of Marshall, Saline County,

HCS SS SB 937 31
5
Missouri. The property to be conveyed is more particularly
6
described as follows:
7
A tract of land located in the Northwest Quarter
8
(NW ¼) of the Northwest Quarter (NW ¼) of
9
Section 10, Township 50 north of the base line,
10
range 21 we s t of the 5th Principal Meridan,
11
Saline County, Missouri, more particularly
12
described as:
13
Beginning at an iron rod on the Westerly right-
14
of-way line of State Highway #41; said iron rod
15
being S01°33'10"W 1247.92 feet, thence
16
N89°30'21"W 174.60 feet from the Northeast
17
corner of the Northwest Quarter (NW ¼) of the
18
Northwest Quarter (NW ¼) of said Section 10;
19
said iron rod also being the Northeast corner of
20
a 20.0 acres tract surveyed on October 1, 1983
21
by Robert Robinson and recorded in Surveyor's
22
Book "W", Page 57;
23
Thence N89°30'20"W following the North Line of
24
said 20.0 acre tract a distance of 541.08 feet
25
to an iron rod;
26
Thence N09°41'55"W a distance of 592.48 feet to
27
an iron rod;
28
Thence S89°30'20"E a distance of 504.67 feet to
29
an iron rod at the intersection with the
30
Westerly right-of-way of State Highway #41;
31
Thence S13°07'22"E following said Westerly right-
32
of-way line a distance of 600.00 feet to point
33
of beginning.
34
Tract contains 7.00 acres more or less.
35
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the
36
terms a n d conditions for the conveyance as the commissioner

HCS SS SB 937 32
37
deems reasonable. Such terms and conditions may include,
38
but not be limited to, the number of appraisals required and
39
the time, place, and terms of the conveyance.
40
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the
41
instrum e nt of conveyance.
1
Section 14. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and
2
empowered to sell , t r ansfer, grant, convey, remise, release,
3
and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of Missouri
4
in property located in the city of Bowling Green, Pike
5
County, Missouri. The property to be conveyed is more
6
particularly desc r ibed as follows:
7
All of a rectangular tract of land in part of
8
the North Quarter of the Southwest Quarter of
9
the Southwest Quarter (N ¼ SW ¼ SW ¼) and part
10
of the South one-half of the North one-half of
11
the Southwest Quarter of the Southwest Quarter
12
(S ½ N ½ SW ¼ SW ¼) all in Section 25, Township
13
53 North, Range 3 West, Pike County, Missouri,
14
described as follows, to-wit:
15
Beginning at an iron pipe marking the Northwest
16
corner of above-mentioned southwest quarter of
17
the southwest quarter (SW ¼ SW ¼) said Section
18
25; Thence North 89 degrees and 51 minutes East
19
on North line said Quarter-Quarter ( ¼ ¼)
20
Section and the South right of way U.S. Highway
21
No. 61, 140 feet; thence on said south right of
22
way on the Arc of a Four (4) Degree curve to the
23
left, to a point south 82 degrees and 13
24
minutes, East on a cord distance of 361.15 feet
25
to a point on said south right of way 50 feet
26
south of centerline said highway, and it being
27
the P. T. of said curve; thence South 89 degrees

HCS SS SB 937 33
28
and 58 minutes East 97.9 feet to a point on said
29
south right of way, 50 feet south of centerline
30
highway; thence following said right of way
31
south 73 degrees and 23 minutes East 104.57 feet
32
to a point on said south right of way, 80 feet
33
south of centerline thereof; thence on along
34
said right-of-way North 89 degrees and 52
35
minutes East 230.32 feet to an iron truck axle,
36
80 feet south of centerline highway; thence
37
South 00 degrees and 30 minutes East 365.28 feet
38
to an iron truck axle for the point of
39
beginning; run thence north along and with the
40
East boundary line between the County of Pike
41
Ruth Jensen Village tract and the Claude and
42
Cora Lee Shaon tract a distance of 240' to a
43
point in the said boundary line; run thence West
44
120' to a point; run thence South on a line
45
parallel with the aforesaid East boundary line
46
240' to a point run thence East 120' to the
47
point of beginning.
48
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the
49
terms a n d conditions for the conveyance as the commissioner
50
deems reasonable. Such terms and conditions may include,
51
but not be limited to, the number of appraisals required and
52
the time, place, and terms of the conveyance.
53
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the
54
instrum e nt of conveyance.
1
Section 15. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and
2
empowered to sell , t r ansfer, grant, convey, remise, release,
3
and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of Missouri
4
in property located in the city of Joplin, Jasper County,

HCS SS SB 937 34
5
Missouri. The property to be conveyed is more particularly
6
described as follows:
7
Beginning at the Northwest Corner of said
8
Southwest Quarter, Southeast Quarter; thence
9
South along the West Line of said Southwest
10
Quarter, Southeast Quarter, a distance of 640.30
11
feet; thence East a distance of 450.00 feet;
12
thence South a distance of 140.00 feet; thence
13
South 56°35' East a distance of 419.30 feet to a
14
point 290.00 feet North of the South Line of
15
said Southwest Quarter, Southeast Quarter;
16
thence North a distance of 1,021.7 feet to a
17
point on the North Line of said Southwest
18
Quarter, Southeast Quarter; thence South 89°15'
19
West along said North Line a distance of 800.00
20
feet to the point of beginning. Containing 13.9
21
acres more or less.
22
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the
23
terms a n d conditions for the conveyance as the commissioner
24
deems reasonable. Such terms and conditions may include,
25
but not be limited to, the number of appraisals required and
26
the time, place, and terms of the conveyance.
27
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the
28
instrum e nt of conveyance.
1
Section 16. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and
2
empowered to sell , t r ansfer, grant, convey, remise, release,
3
and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of Missouri
4
in property located in the city of Potosi, Washington
5
County, Missouri. The property to be conveyed is more
6
particularly desc r ibed as follows:
7
Beginning at an iron rod 50.00 feet South 39°16'
8
West from a limestone monument being corner

HCS SS SB 937 35
9
Number Two of U.S. Survey No. 430 on the North
10
boundary of said Section Eleven, thence North
11
59°51'30" West 359.10 feet to a steel post on
12
the South marginal line of Mine Street, thence
13
along said marginal line South 39°16' West
14
220.03 feet to a steel marker, thence leaving
15
said marginal line South 59°51'30" East 359.10
16
Feet to an iron rod, thence North 39°16' East
17
220.03 feet to the point of beginning,
18
containing 1.81 acres being 0.03 acres in said
19
Section Fourteen and 1.78 acres in said Section
20
Eleven.
21
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the
22
terms a n d conditions for the conveyance as the commissioner
23
deems reasonable. Such terms and conditions may include,
24
but not be limited to, the number of appraisals required and
25
the time, place, and terms of the conveyance.
26
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the
27
instrum e nt of conveyance.
1
Section 17. 1. The governor is hereby authorized and
2
empowered to sell , t r ansfer, grant, convey, remise, release,
3
and forever quitclaim all interest of the state of Missouri
4
in property located in the city of Springfield, Greene
5
County, Missouri. The property to be conveyed is more
6
particularly desc r ibed as follows:
7
PART OF THE SOUTH HALF OF THE NORTHEAST QUARTER
8
OF SECTION 18, TOWNSHIP 29 NORTH, RANGE 21 WEST
9
IN THE CITY OF SPRINGFIELD, GREENE COUNTY,
10
MISSOURI, DESCRIBED AS FOLLOWS: COMMENCING AT
11
AN EXISTING 5/8-INCH IRON PIN I N CONCRETE ON THE
12
NORTH RIGHT-OF-WAY LINE OF PYTHIAN STREET,
13
1118.05 FEET WEST OF THE WEST RIGHT-OF-WAY LINE

HCS SS SB 937 36
14
OF GLENSTONE AVENUE; THENCE N88°02'46"W ALONG
15
THE NORTH RIGHT-OF-WAY LINE OF PYTHIAN STREET,
16
173.39 FEET TO AN EXISTING 5/8-INCH IRON PIN IN
17
CONCRETE; THENCE N85°14'59"W ALONG SAID RIGHT-OF-
18
WAY LINE, 151.66 FEET TO AN EXISTING 5/8-INCH
19
IRON PIN AT THE SOUTHWEST CORNER OF A PARCEL OF
20
LAND DEEDED TO THE STATE OF MISSOURI, DEPARTMENT
21
OF ELEMENTARY AND SECONDARY EDUCATION AS
22
DESCRIBED IN BOOK 1615, PAGE 1118 AT THE GREENE
23
COUNTY RECORDER'S OFFICE, FOR THE POINT OF
24
BEGINNING OF THE PARCEL DESCRIBED HEREIN; THENCE
25
N85°11'41"W ALONG SAID RIGHT-OF-WAY LINE, 509.57
26
FEET TO AN EXISTING 5/8-INCH IRON PIN AT THE
27
SOUTHWEST CORNER OF A TRACT OF LAND DEEDED TO
28
THE STATE OF MISSOURI, DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC
29
HEALTH AND WELFARE AS DESCRIBED IN BOOK 1333,
30
PAGE 15 AT THE GREENE COUNTY RECORDER'S OFFICE;
31
THENCE N01°42'53"E ALONG THE WEST LINE OF SAID
32
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH AND WELFARE TRACT,
33
673.02 FEET TO A 5/8-INCH IRON PIN (CAPPED
34
"GREAT RIVER 2001011476"); THENCE LEAVING SAID
35
WEST LINE, S88°01'21"E, 407.00 FEET TO A COTTON
36
PICKER SPINDLE SET IN ASPHALT; THENCE
37
N01°42'53"E, 230.00 FEET TO A 5/8-INCH IRON PIN
38
(CAPPED "GREAT RIVER 2001011476") AT THE
39
NORTHEAST CORNER OF A PARCEL OF LAND DEEDED TO
40
ARC PROPERTY MANAGEMENT, LLC AS DESCRIBED IN
41
BOOK 2011, PAGE 018367-11 AT THE GREENE COUNTY
42
RECORDER'S OFFICE; THENCE S88°01'21"E, 49.19
43
FEET TO A COTTON PICKER SPINDLE AT THE NORTHWEST
44
CORNER OF A PARCEL OF LAND DEEDED TO THE
45
DEVELOPMENTAL CENTER OF THE OZARKS AS DESCRIBED

HCS SS SB 937 37
46
IN BOOK 1715, PAGE 1822 AT THE GREENE COUNTY
47
RECORDER'S OFFICE; THENCE S01°51'45"W, 393.89
48
FEET TO A 5/8-INCH IRON PIN (CAPPED "GREAT RIVER
49
2001011476") AT AN ANGLE POINT IN THE WEST LINE
50
OF A PARCEL OF LAND DEEDED TO THE DEVELOPMENTAL
51
CENTER OF THE OZARKS AS DESCRIBED IN BOOK 1599,
52
PAGE 1537 AT THE GREENE COUNTY RECORDER'S
53
OFFICE; THENCE S42°22'19"E ALONG SAID WEST LINE,
54
78.96 FEET TO A 5/8-INCH IRON PIN IN CONCRETE AT
55
THE NORTHWEST CORNER OF A PARCEL OF LAND DEEDED
56
TO THE STATE OF MISSOURI, DEPARTMENT OF
57
ELEMENTARY AND SECONDARY EDUCATION AS DESCRIBED
58
IN BOOK 1615, PAGE 1118 AT THE GREENE COUNTY
59
RECORDER'S OFFICE; THENCE S01°52'04"W ALONG THE
60
WEST LINE OF SAID DEPARTMENT OF ELEMENTARY AND
61
SECONDARY EDUCATION PARCEL, 477.80 FEET TO THE
62
POINT OF BEGINNING. (BEARINGS ARE BASED ON GRID
63
NORTH, MISSOURI COOR DINATE SYSTEM OF 1983,
64
CENTRAL ZONE.)
65
2. The commissioner of administration shall set the
66
terms a n d conditions for the conveyance as the commissioner
67
deems reasonable. Such terms and conditions may include,
68
but not be limited to, the number of appraisals required and
69
the time, place, and terms of the conveyance.
70
3. The attorney general shall approve the form of the
71
instrum e nt of conveyance.
